Nevada, session 83, AB374.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall establish the
-
*AB374*

– 2 –
curriculum for a workshop to promote the mental health of pupils
enrolled in the school district or charter school. The curriculum
must be organized and, with the assistance of teachers,
administrators and other educational personnel, coordinated by
school counselors, school psychologists, school social workers or
the school safety specialist designated pursuant to NRS 388.910,
who shall provide instruction and activities designed to, in an age-
appropriate manner:
(a) Promote positive mental health;
(b) Meet the immediate needs and concerns of each pupil,
whether the needs or concerns of the pupil require, without
limitation, counseling, consultation, referral or information;
(c) Provide individualized and positive feedback concerning
the academic performance of each pupil; and
(d) Provide related assistance and instruction as is deemed
necessary.
2. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall ensure that the
workshop described in subsection 1 is provided:
(a) To pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12,
inclusive, in each public school within the school district or in the
charter school, as applicable;
(b) During the school day; and
(c) At least once each month.
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB374*